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DTC P11 21/19 Accel. Position Sensor Circuit (IDL SW/
Range)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P11 20/19 on page DI−67.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

Condition (a) or (b) continues 0.05 sec. or more:
(a) IDLONandVA> 1.4V
(b) IDLONandVAS> 1.4V

P1121/19

Condition (a) or (b) continues 0.5 sec. or more:
(a) IDLOFFandVA<0.6V
(b) IDL OFF and VAS < 0.6 V

SOpenorshort inacceleratorpedalpositionsensorcircuit
SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEngineECU

Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.05 sec. or more:
(a) 0.6 V < VA < 4.4 V and 0.6 V < VAS < 4.4 V
(b)VA − VAS>0.5V

Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC P11 20/19 on page DI−67.
INSPECTION PROCEDURE
When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester IIandread IDLsignal.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester II main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the IDL signal.

OK:

Accelerator pedal IDL signal

Fully open OFF

Fully closed ON

OKGotostep4.

NG
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2 Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of the en-
gine ECU.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 to 14 V

Fully open 0 to 3 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.
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4 Connect intelligent tester II, and read accelerator pedal operating percentage.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester II main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the accelerator pedal opening percentage.

OK:

Accelerator pedal
Accelerator pedal opening position

expressed as percentage

Fully open Approx. 65%

Fully closed Approx. 18%

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

NG

5 Check voltage between terminal VCC of wire harness side connector and body
ground (See page DI−67, Step 2).

NG Go to step 8.

OK

6 Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−67, Step 3).

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

7 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
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OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

8 Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−67, Step 5).

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

Check for open in harness and connecter between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN−1 9) .

When not using intelligent tester II:

1 Checkvoltagebetweenterminals IDLandE2CofengineECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of the en-
gine ECU.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 to 14 V

Fully open 0 to 3 V

OK Go to step 3.

NG

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.



DI−78
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

1HD−FTV ENGINE SUP (RM1179E)

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

3 Check voltage between terminal 4 of wire harness side connector and body-
ground (See page DI−67, Step 2).

NG Go to step 6.

OK

4 Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−67, Step 3).

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

6 Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−67, Step 5).

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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OK

Check for open in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN−1 9) .


